test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-glossing.yaml
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsshibniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsshibniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiinsshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinynaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinynaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinynaanbaniig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinsnaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsnaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinynaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinynaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinynaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinywaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinywaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinywaabniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsnaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsnaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinswaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinswaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinswaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinywaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinywaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinyniwbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinyniwbaniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinswaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinswaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsniwbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiimshinaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshinaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiimshinaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshinaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiimshiwaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshiwaadig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiimshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiimshinaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiimshinaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshinaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiimshinaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiimshinaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshinaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiimshiwaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiimshiwaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshiwaag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiimshiwaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiimshiwaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: mitgwaabiimshinwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiimshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiimshibniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiimshibniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiimshibniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiimshibniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiimshibniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiimshibniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimshibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimshibniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimshibniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimshibniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiimshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiimnaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiimnaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiimnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiimnaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiimnaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiimnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiimwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiimwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiimwaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiimniwbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiimniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiishnaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiishnaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiishnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiishnaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiishnaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiishnaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiishwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiishwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiishwaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiishwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiishwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiishniwbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiishniwbaniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiinymishnaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinymishnaandig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinymishnaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinymishwaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishwaadig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaadig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiinymishniwba
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiinsmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiinymishnaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiinymishnaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiinymishnaanig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsmishnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinymishnaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinymishnaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinymishwaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinymishwaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishwaag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishnaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishwaag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiinymishwaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiinymishwaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: mitgwaabiinymishniwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiinymishniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiinsmishwaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmishwaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: mitgwaabiinsmishniwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinymishbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinymishbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinymishbaniig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinsmishbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsmishbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsmishbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinymishbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinymishbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymishbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsmishbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsmishbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmishbaniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinymishbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinymishbaniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsmishbaniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmishbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinymishbaniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinymishbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiinymishbaniig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsmishbaniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmishbaniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiinsmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinyminaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinyminaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyminaanbaniig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinsminaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsminaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsminaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinyminaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinyminaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyminaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinymiwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinymiwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinymiwaabniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsminaanbaniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsminaanbaniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsminaanbaniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiinsmiwaabniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsmiwaabniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsmiwaabniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinymiwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinymiwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinyminwibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinyminwibniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsmiwaabniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsmiwaabniing
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: mitgwaabiinsminwibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiinsminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinyshinaanbaniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiinyshinaanbaniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyshinaanbaniig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiinsshinaanbaniin
